Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.361

Service of process on registered foreign limited liability companies.

Service of process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the foreign limited liability company may be made in accordance with RCW 23.95.450.

[ 2015 c 176 s 7125; 2015 c 188 s 71.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.